Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 2

Abandoned Cultural Property Act

66-29-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Abandoned Cultural Property Act.”

Acts 1984, ch. 862, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 7-601.

66-29-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abandoned cultural property” means cultural property meeting the following three (3) conditions:

The property shall have been deposited with a museum, historical society, or similar not-for-profit institution for a period of at least twenty (20) years; or the property shall have been deposited with a museum, historical society, or similar not-for-profit institution for a definite term which has been expired for at least twenty (20) years;

The museum, historical society, or similar not-for-profit institution has been unable to contact the original depositor by certified mail; and

The original depositor or such depositor's heirs or assigns have not contacted the museum, historical society, or similar not-for-profit institution for at least twenty (20) years;

“Cultural property” means any work of art, regardless of the medium; any work of decorative art; any craft work; photographs; documents; costumes; weapons; the tools and equipment of the various trades and professions; archaeological and geological specimens; zoological and botanical specimens; historical postage and currency; silverware; objects associated with historical persons or events; and in general, any object which, when exhibited, serves to further the educational goals of the exhibiting institution; and

“Museum” means those museums and art galleries owned or operated by the state or any political subdivision of the state, and those museums, historical societies, and art galleries owned and operated by not-for-profit corporations.

Acts 1984, ch. 862, § 2; 1985, ch. 153, § 1; 1991, ch. 203, §§ 1, 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 7-601.

66-29-203. Abandonment — Notice — Vesting of title in museum.

Any abandoned cultural property held by a museum to which no person has made claim shall be deemed to be abandoned.

A museum holding abandoned cultural property shall publish in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the institution is located at least once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks a notice and listing of the property. The notice shall contain:

The name and last known address, if any, of the last known owner of the property;

A description of the property; and

A statement that if proof of claim is not presented by the owner to the museum and if the owner's right to receive that property is not established to the museum's satisfaction within sixty-five (65) days from the date of the second published notice, the property will be deemed abandoned and shall become the property of the museum.

If no claim has been made to the abandoned cultural property within sixty-five (65) days from the date of the second published notice, title to the property shall vest in the museum, free from all claims of the owner and of all persons claiming through or under the owner.

Acts 1984, ch. 862, § 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 7-601.

66-29-204. Exclusivity of provisions.

This part shall control the procedure and disposition of any property to which it applies in lieu of any other procedure prescribed by law including the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, compiled in part 1 of this chapter.

Acts 1984, ch. 862, § 4; 2017, ch. 457, § 2.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Uniform Unclaimed Property Act” for “Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.